src/phonology/olo-phon.twolc
!! !!!The Livvi (Olonets) Karelian morphophonological/twolc rules file 



Alphabet
a b c č d e f g h i j k l m n o p r s š ş t u v w y z ž ƶ ü ä ö
A B C Č D E F G H I J K L M N O P R S Š Ş T U V W Y Z Ž Ƶ Ü Ä Ö
y
Y
! MODIFIER LETTER APOSTROPHE 02BC
ʼ

! Vowel harmony with "(t)a/ä"
!
!%{aäPar%}:0	!!= @CODE@  This is for the partitive and other vowel harmony not including diphthong phenomena
%{aä%}:0

 %{aoeInf%}:a	!!= @CODE@ Back vowel infinitive marker
 %{äöeInf%}:ä	!!= @CODE@ Front vowel infinitive marker

! %{aäDiph%}:ä !!= @CODE@  This is for the infinitive marker after i and u stems

 %{aäoeöuiy%}:ä !!= * @CODE@  with partitive type koivuu
 %{aäoeö%}:ä !!= * @CODE@  newer This is for diphthongs such as the infinitive marker after i and u stems ampuo
%{aäuyiØ%}:ä !!= * @CODE@ in participle endings anticipating PÄIVY or KOIRU type

 %{ui%}:i !!= @CODE@  in imperative before %{aä%}:

! Vowel harmony with "loi/löi" also kalatOÖ1in
%{oö%}:o
%{oö%}:ö

%{oöØ%}:0 !!= @CODE@  Used in present participle

! Vowel harmony with "ttu/tty"
!%{uy%}:u
%{uy%}:y

 %{ijPRC%}:j !!= @CODE@ participle
 %{lnrs%}:n  !!= * @CODE@ e.g. in perfect participles
 %{dtlnr%}:d !!= * @CODE@ e.g. infinitive and Ind+Prs+Pl3



! in verb type V_AVATA
!A2:a
A2:ä
!A2:o
!A2:ö

! this appears in the illative
V1:a
V1:e
V1:i
V1:o
V1:u
V1:y
V1:ä
V1:ö

! These appear with the inessive and adessive
V2:a
V2:e
V2:i
V2:o
V2:u
V2:y
V2:ä
V2:ö

! These reduplicate the preceding vowel if it in turn is preceded by a consonant
V3:a
V3:e
V3:i
V3:o
V3:u
V3:y
V3:ä
V3:ö
V3:0

%^DEVOICE:0   !!= @CODE@ 
%^VOICE:0   !!= @CODE@  pestä : pezen

! syllable boundary for V_AVATA
%^SyllBound:0


! Used with ks:s, ps:s
%^KS2S:0

! no change
! The example here is for something that should not be done
! We have two infinite sets, Olonets-Karelian and incoming loanwords.
! The original idea was to make a rule changing all instances of 
! adjacent double aa to ua. For this reason a special trigger was
! to be inserted into the lexc stem of a word to prevent such a rule
! from occurring. Since the infinite Olonets-Karelian set is more predictable
! and perhaps smaller than the incoming loanword set, it is better
! to literally spell out adjacent vowels that are constant. 2019-09-02 JMR
%^NONE:0 ! This will break vowel change, e.g. sa%^NONEamelaine

! this k is not effected by gradation
K1:k
%^NoGrad:0 ! This will be placed after a stem to break Gradation

! This is used in combination with WGStem to trigger change in penultimate coda
! The penultimate coda trigger is used profusely in sms and vro
! it allows for distinguishing between ultimate and penultimate coda,
! but due to this distinction it is also a good idea to configure with
! ./configure --enable-reversed-intersect
! , which means that the triggers are seen before the stems and requires
! LESS memory. 2019-09-02 JMR
%^Pen:0  !!= @CODE@ pagisou paistah in combination with WGStem to trigger

! this weakens the stem _ompel_ to _ommel_
%^WGStem:0


%^D2Z:0	 !!= @CODE@ ! The ti => zi

! the a => o
%^A2O:0


%^E2O:0	!!= @CODE@  the e => o, e => ö

! the a => u, ä => y
%^A2U:0
%^A2UÄ2Y:0

%^Ä2I:0		!!= @CODE@  ä => i
%^A2UÄ2I:0		!!= @CODE@  a => u, ä => i

%^ILoss:0  !!= @CODE@  the i => 0 __reboi reboloi__
%^V2U:0	   !!= @CODE@  v => y __kävvä käydy__

! Vowel raising
%^RVow:0   !!= _@CODE@_ 
%^RmVow:0   !!= _@CODE@_ vowel removal, e.g. with superlative

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <


%- !Hyphen in  constructions 
 «  ! Derivational prefix
 »  ! Derivational suffix
%>  ! Inflectional suffix
#   ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds


%^LVow:0
%^LCns:0
%^WCns:0
%^AtoO:0
%^ÄtoÖ:0
%^OddSyll:0
%^StretchSyll2:0
%^SyllBr:0
%^E1:0

!! Triggers dictating right context phenomena
%{back%}:0 !!= * _@CODE@_ back harmony until harmony boundary, i.e. word boundary
%{front%}:0 !!= * _@CODE@_ front harmony until harmony boundary, i.e. word boundary



;


Sets

VowBack = a o u A O U ;
VowFront = ä ö y ü Ä Ö Y Ü ;
VowNeutral = e i E I ; 
VowNonHigh = a o ä ö e A O Ä Ö E ;
VowNotHiLab = a o ä ö e i 
              A O Ä Ö E I ;

Vow = a o u ä ö y ü e i 
      A O U Ä Ö Y Ü E I ;

Cns = b c č d f g h j k l m n p r s ş š t v z ƶ ž 
      B C Č D F G H J K L M N P R S Ş Š T V Z Ƶ Ž ;

Letters = Vow Cns ;

HarmDummy = %{back%} %{front%} ;

Dummy = %^ILoss %^KS2S %^WGStem %^E1 %^SyllBound  %^VOICE %> %^NONE HarmDummy ;


Definitions

! Front Trigger
FT =  [ #: Cns* [ VowFront | VowNeutral | i: ] | :VowFront ] [ %> | VowFront: | ʼ | Cns: | %{aä%}:ä | %{oö%}:ö | %{uy%}:y ]* \[ # | VowBack: | :VowBack ]* ;
! [ #: Cns* [ VowFront | VowNeutral | i: ] | :VowFront ] [ %> | VowFront: | Cns: | %{aä%}:ä | %{oö%}:ö | %{uy%}:y ]*  ;

FHarm = [ %{front%}: \[ # | %{back%}: ]* ] ;

! Back Trigger 
BT =     #: Cns* ( [ VowNeutral | i: ] [ Dummy: | %> | VowNeutral | VowBack: | :VowBack | Cns: | :Cns | ʼ ]* )  [ VowBack: | :VowBack ] \[ # | VowFront: | :VowFront ]* ;
!    #: Cns* ( [ VowNeutral | i: ] [ Dummy: | %> | VowBack: | :VowBack | Cns: | :Cns ]* )  [ VowBack: | :VowBack ] [ Dummy: | %> | VowNeutral | i: | %{aä%}:0 | VowBack: | :VowBack | Cns: | :Cns ]* ;

BHarm = [ %{back%}: \[ # | %{front%}: ]* ] ;

!Front Trigger with consonant
FTCons = [FT|FHarm] [ Cns: (ʼ:) ] ;

!Back Trigger with consonant
BTCons = [BT | BHarm ] [ Cns: (ʼ:) ] ;

! Cns or Cns with palatal
ConsPalOrNot = [Cns: (ʼ:)]+ ;

! Gradation strong to weak
!GS2W = [ p:v | m p:m | t:0 | l t:l | r t:r | n t:n | s t:s | k:0 | l k:0 | r k:0 | n k:g | s k:0 ] ;

! Short vowel
SV = [ [ #: | Cns+ ] :Vow ] ;

 ! If a vowel is preceeded by this, is can be long
!  in both the inessive and the adessive
! Inessive lengthening of vowel
IL = [ #: Cns* Vow : Cns:+ | Cns* Vow+ Cns:+  Vow:+ Cns:+  ] ;

!! Right context for gradation
GRC =  [ [ ( %> ) %{aä%}: | [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | %{uy%}: | Vow: | :Vow ] ( %>  i )  |  %>  i ] %^WGStem:0  ;

! oma:ommaa, 
! Subsequent Long Vowel
! preceeded by "Cns _"
! 2012-10-11 SLV =  [ :Vow [ ( %> %^LCns:0 %^LVow:0 | %> %^LCns:0 | %> i %> | %> ) [ V1:Vow | %{aä%}: ] |  0:Vow %> ( %^LCns:0 | %^WGStem: ) %^LVow: | %> %^LCns:0  ] ] ;

!! !!!Rules
Rules

!"%{aäPar%}:o"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:o <=>   [%{back%}: o: |o: %{back%}:] %> _ [# | %> ] ;
! ! o: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m %{oö%}: | t t %{oö%}: ]];


!"%{aäPar%}:ö"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:ö <=>  [%{front%}: ö: |ö: %{front%}:]  %> _ [# | %> ] ;
! ! ö: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m %{oö%}: | t t %{oö%}: ]];


!"%{aäDiph%}:o"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäDiph%}:o <=> o: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];
!         [ o: | u] %> _ [ # | %> ] ;

!"%{aäDiph%}:ö"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäDiph%}:ö <=> ö: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];
!         [ ö: | y] %> _ [ # | %> ] ;

!"%{aäDiph%}:e"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäDiph%}:e <=> [ e: | i ] %> _ [ # | %> ]  ;

!"%{aäDiph%}:ä"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäDiph%}:ä <=> [ FTCons %> | [FT|FHarm] %> [ d: | v v | j | h | t ]] _ [ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ h | # | %> ] | i | %> n %{uy%}: | %> g i | # ] ;
!   [ FTCons %> | [FT|FHarm] ( %^WGStem:0 ) %> [ t (t) | s s ]] _ [  h | %> g | # ] ;
!               Cns:  ä: %{front%}:  (%^Ä2I:) %> _ \[ .#. | %{back%}: ]* [  %> | # ] ;
!   [ FTCons %> | [ [FT|FHarm] ] ( %^WGStem:0 (%^E1:) ) %> [ (k) k (%{ui%}:i) |g (%{ui%}:)| m | d: | (t) t | s s ]] _ [  h | z |  s | ( n ) n | t t | m m | v |l | %> %{ijPRC%}: | %> g | # ] ;
! !€# lʼykkä%^WGStem%>kk%{ui%}%{aä%}mm%{oö%}
! !€0 lʼyk0ä0%>kkiämmö
! !€# lʼykkä%>%{aä%}%>m%{aä%}h
! !€0 lʼykki%>ä%>mäh
! !€# lʼykkä%>%{aä%}%>%{ijPRC%}%{aä%}%^A2U
! !€0 lʼykki0ä%>jy0

"%{aä%}:a"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{aä%}:a <=> BHarm (%>) _ ;

"%{aä%}:ä"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{aä%}:ä <=> FHarm (%>) _ ;


! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Back
!"%{aäDiph%}:a"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäDiph%}:a <=> [ BTCons %> | [BT|BHarm] %> [ d: | v v | h | j | t ]] _ [ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ h | # | %> ] | i | %> n %{uy%}: | %> g i | # ] ;
!   [ BTCons %> | [BT|BHarm] ( %^WGStem:0 )  %> [ t (t) | s s ]] _ [  h | %> g | # ] ;
!               Cns:  a: %{back%}: (%^A2U:) %> _ \[ .#. | %{front%}: ]* [  %> | # ] ;
!   [ BTCons %> | [ [BT|BHarm] ] ( %^WGStem:0 (%^E1:) ) %> [ (k) k (%{ui%}:u) |g (%{ui%}:) | m | d: | (t) t | s s ]] _ [  h | z | s | ( n ) n | t t | m m | v | l | %> %{ijPRC%}: | %> g | # ] ;
! !€# kanda%>kk%{ui%}%{aä%}mm%{oö%}
! !€0 kanda%>kkuammo
! !€# pagis%>d%{aä%}%^WGStemh
! !€0 pa0is%>ta0h

!"%{aäDiph%}:o"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäDiph%}:o <=> [ o: | u ] %{back%}: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];
!         [ o: ] %{back%}: %> _ [# | %> ] ;

!"%{aäDiph%}:ö"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäDiph%}:ö <=> [ ö: | y ] %{front%}: %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];
!         Cns: [ ö: ] %{front%}: %> _ [# | %> ] ;

! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Back
!"%{aäPar%}:a"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäPar%}:a <=>
!  [BHarm BTCons ( %> ) | [BHarm] %>  %{ijPRC%}:j %> | BHarm [ %{ui%}:u | %{uy%}:u | %{aäPar%}:u | a:u ] ( %> ) ] _ [ # | ( ( %^WGStem:0 ) %> )  [ Cns: | %{uy%}:u ] | %^WGStem:0 ] ;
!   [BT|BHarm] %>  %{ijPRC%}:j %> %{ui%}:u _ ;
!  [BT|BHarm] %> d: _  ;
! !€# pagis%>d%{aä%}%^WGStemh
! !€0 pa0is%>ta0h

!"%{aäPar%}:u"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:u <=>
! [ u: |[ [BT|BHarm] |BHarm :VowBack Cns:* ] ( %> ) %{uy%}:u ] %> _ ( %^WGStem:0 ) [ # | %>  [ g i | n | t | %{uy%}: | m m [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] | t t [ %{oö%}: |o|ö] ]];
! !€# luadi%{back%}%^WGStem%^E1%>tt%{uy%}%>%{uy%}
! !€0 luaji000%>ttu%>u

!       BHarm  [ u ] %> _  ;
! 	 [BT|BHarm] [ Cns: | %{ijPRC%}: ] _ [ %^A2U:0 [ # | %> g i ] | %> %{aäPar%}:a ] ;

! ! Vowel harmony suffixes Front
!"%{aäPar%}:ä"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäPar%}:ä <=>
!  [FHarm FTCons ( %> ) | [FT|FHarm] %>  %{ijPRC%}:j %> | FHarm [ %{ui%}:i | %{uy%}:y | %{aäPar%}:i | ä:i ] ( %> ) ] _ [ # | ( ( %^WGStem:0 ) %> )  [ Cns: | %{uy%}:y ] | %^WGStem:0 ] ;


!"%{aäPar%}:e"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
! %{aäPar%}:e <=>  e:  %> _ [ # | (%^WGStem:) %> ] ;
! !€ hävi%>%{aäPar%}%>%{uy%}
! !€ hävi0e%>y
! !€ hävi%>%{aäPar%}%>n
! !€ hävi%>e0n

!"%{aäPar%}:i"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:i <=> [FT|FHarm] Cns: _ %> %{aäPar%}:ä ;
!   FHarm  Cns: i %> _ ;

!"%{aäPar%}:y"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:y <=> [FT|FHarm] [ Cns: | %{ijPRC%}: ] _ %^A2U:0 [ # | %> g i ] ;
!    FHarm  y %> _ ;

!"%{aäPar%}:0"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:0 <=> Cns:  _ %> i  ;
! !            [ a | ä | i ] i _ %^A2U: ; 

!"%{aäPar%}:0 right"
! ! __@RULENAME@__
!%{aäPar%}:0 <=> _ %> i  ;

"%{aäoeö%}:a"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeö%}:a <=> [a:] (%{back%}:) %> _ ;
 
"%{aäoeö%}:ä"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeö%}:ä <=> [ä:] (%{front%}:) %> _ ;
 
"%{aäoeö%}:o"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeö%}:o <=> [u| o:] (%{back%}:) %> _ ;
 
"%{aäoeö%}:e"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeö%}:e <=> [i| e:] (HarmDummy:) %> _ ;
 
"%{aäoeö%}:ö"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeö%}:ö <=> [y| ö:] (%{front%}:) %> _ ;
 
"{aäoeöuiy%}:a"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeöuiy%}:a <=> [a: | %{ui%}:u ] (%{back%}:) %> _ ;

"{aäoeöuiy%}:ä"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeöuiy%}:ä <=> [ä:| %{ui%}:i] (%{front%}:) %> _ ;

"{aäoeöuiy%}:o"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeöuiy%}:o <=> o: (%{back%}:) %> _ ;

"{aäoeöuiy%}:e"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeöuiy%}:e <=> e: (HarmDummy:) %> _ ;

"{aäoeöuiy%}:ö"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeöuiy%}:ö <=> ö: (%{front%}:) %> _ ;

"{aäoeöuiy%}:u"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeöuiy%}:u <=> [ u|%{uy%}:u] (%{back%}:) %> _ ;

"{aäoeöuiy%}:i"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeöuiy%}:i <=> i (HarmDummy:) %> _ ;

"{aäoeöuiy%}:y"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{aäoeöuiy%}:y <=> [y|%{uy%}:y] (%{front%}:) %> _ ;


"e:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 e:0 <=>
  Cns: (%^VOICE:)  _ (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %^RmVow:   ;
! Cns: (%^VOICE:)  _ (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %^RmVow:   ;
        [ u | a | o | ä | ö | y ] (HarmDummy:) %> %{ijPRC%}:  [%{oöØ%}:o|%{oöØ%}:ö] %> i %> _ n ;
